Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB13.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Healthy Employee and Healthy Workplace Act.Section 2. Scope of act.This act relates to promoting healthy families and workplaces by establishing a mandatory employer-paid sick leave policy in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth.1234567891011121314151617 "Employee." As the term "employe" is defined in section 3 of the Minimum Wage Act. The term does not include an employee covered by a collective bargaining agreement if the agreement expressly provides for:(1) The wages, hours of work and working conditions of employees.(2) Paid sick leave or a paid leave or paid time off policy that permits the use of sick leave for employees.(3) Final and binding arbitration of disputes concerning the application of the paid sick leave provisions of the collective bargaining agreement."Employer." As defined in section 3 of the Minimum Wage Act."Family member." Any of the following:(1) A child, stepchild or legal ward or a child to whom an employee stands in loco parentis, notwithstanding the age or dependency status of the child.(2) A biological, adoptive or foster parent, stepparent or legal guardian of an employee or the employee's spouse or a person who stood in loco parentis when the employee was a minor.(3) A spouse or domestic partner.(4) A grandparent.(5) A grandchild.(6) A sibling."Minimum Wage Act." The act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968."Municipality." A city, borough, incorporated town or township. The term includes a municipality operating under 53 Pa.C.S. Pt. III Subpt. E (relating to home rule and optional plan government).20250SB0013PN0846 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Paid sick leave." Time that is compensated at the rate provided under section 5 and is provided by an employer to an employee under this act."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth.Section 4. Paid sick leave.(a) Requirement.--An employer shall provide paid sick leave to an employee for, at a minimum, the following purposes:(1) Diagnosis, care or treatment of an existing health condition of, or preventive care for, the employee or employee's family member.(2) Diagnosis, treatment, care, counseling or other assistance for a physical, mental or emotional injury suffered by the employee or the employee's family member due to an act of abuse as defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102(a) (relating to definitions) or sexual violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 62A03 (relating to definitions).(3) A public health or public safety emergency involving the employee or the employee's family member.(b) Availability.--An employer shall provide paid sick leave to an employee beginning on the day after the date the employee has worked for the employer for at least 30 days within a year from the commencement of employment.(c) Accrual and use.--(1) Paid sick leave shall accrue to an employee at the rate of one hour per every 30 hours worked, beginning at the commencement of employment. An employee who is exempt from overtime requirements of section 5 of the Minimum Wage Act as an administrative, executive or professional employee shall be deemed to work 40 hours per workweek for the purposes of 20250SB0013PN0846 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this act, unless the employee's normal workweek is less than 40 hours, in which case the employee shall accrue paid sick leave based upon the normal workweek.(2) An employer may limit an employee's use of paid sick leave to 56 hours or seven days in each year of employment.(3) Unless otherwise approved by the employer, an employee may not use accrued paid sick leave prior to 91 days of employment, after which day the employee may use paid sick leave as the paid sick leave is accrued.(4) Accrued paid sick leave shall carry over to the following year of employment, except that an employer may limit an employee's total accrual of paid sick leave to 80 hours or 10 days annually.(5) An employer may, at the employer's discretion:(i) Provide the full amount of paid sick leave to the employee at the beginning of each year.(ii) Lend paid sick leave to an employee in advance of accrual with proper documentation.(6) An employee may determine the amount of paid sick leave the employee needs to use, except that an employer may set a reasonable minimum increment, not to exceed two hours, for the use of paid sick leave.(7) An employee must provide reasonable advance written or verbal notification to the employer if the need to use paid sick leave is foreseeable. If the need to use paid sick leave is unforeseeable, the employee must provide written or verbal notice of the need for the leave to the employer as soon as practicable.(8) An employer may not require, as a condition of using paid sick leave, an employee to search for or find a 20250SB0013PN0846 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replacement worker to cover the hours or days during which the employee uses paid sick leave.(9) An employer may require an employee to provide documentation from the individual providing treatment or care under subsection (a) if the employee is absent for three or more consecutive days.(d) Exemption.--An employer shall not be required to provide additional paid sick leave under this act if the following conditions are met:(1) On the effective date of this section the employer has a paid leave policy or paid time off policy.(2) The employer makes available an amount of leave that may be used for the same purposes and under the same conditions as specified in this section.(3) The policy does either of the following:(i) Satisfies the accrual, carryover and use requirements of this section.(ii) At the beginning of each calendar year, provides an employee with no less than 56 hours or seven days of paid sick leave, or equivalent paid leave or paid time off. An employer may prorate the amount of paid sick leave or equivalent paid leave or paid time off provided to an employee in the employee's first year of employment based on the employee's date of hire.(e) Notice.--(1) An employer shall provide an employee with written notice stating the amount of paid sick leave available or paid time off leave that the employer provides in lieu of sick leave in the manner prescribed under this act. The department may impose penalties on the employer for failure 20250SB0013PN0846 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to provide notice in accordance with this subsection.(2) An employer shall display a poster, developed by the department, in a conspicuous place within each workplace of the employer, that states all of the following:(i) That an employee is entitled to accrue, request and use paid sick leave.(ii) The amount of sick leave provided for by this act.(iii) The terms of use of paid sick leave.(iv) That retaliation or discrimination against an employee who requests paid sick leave or uses paid sick leave, or both, is prohibited, and that an employee has the right under law to file a complaint with the department against an employer who retaliates or discriminates against the employee.Section 5. Rate of pay.The rate of pay for paid sick leave shall be the greater of the minimum wage as provided in section 4 of the Minimum Wage Act or the employee's hourly wage. If the employee in the 90 days of employment before using accrued sick leave had different hourly pay rates, was paid by commission or piece rate or was a nonexempt salaried employee, the rate of pay shall be calculated by dividing the employee's total wages, not including overtime premium pay, by the employee's total hours worked in the full pay periods of the prior 90 days of employment.Section 6. Payment of sick leave.(a) Time.--An employer shall provide payment for sick leave used by an employee no later than the payday for the next regular payroll period after the sick leave was used.(b) Compensation.--An employer is not required to provide 20250SB0013PN0846 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compensation to an employee for accrued, unused paid sick leave upon termination, resignation, retirement or other separation from employment, except that, if an employee separates from an employer and is rehired by the employer within one year from the date of separation, previously accrued and unused paid sick leave must be reinstated. The employee may use previously accrued and unused paid sick leave and shall accrue additional paid sick leave upon being rehired.Section 7. Prohibitions.An employer may not:(1) Deny an employee the right to use accrued sick leave.(2) Discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, suspend, reduce the wages of or in any manner discriminate against an employee for doing any of the following:(i) Using accrued sick leave or attempting to exercise the right to use accrued sick leave.(ii) Filing a complaint or alleging a violation of this act.(iii) Cooperating in an investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation of this act.(iv) Opposing a policy or practice that is prohibited under this act.Section 8. Complaint procedure.An employee may file with the department a complaint against an employer for an alleged violation of this act. The department shall establish a process for investigating and resolving a complaint.Section 9. Employer penalties.An employer who willfully violates the posting provisions of 20250SB0013PN0846 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 4(e)(2) shall be subject to a penalty, not to exceed $250 for each offense, to be imposed by the department.Section 10. Remedies.(a) Department.--The department may order an employer who is found to be in violation of this act to do all of the following:(1) Reinstate the employee with or without back pay.(2) Pay the employee the amount of sick leave unlawfully withheld.(3) Pay the employee an additional sum in the form of an administrative penalty. If paid sick leave was unlawfully withheld, the administrative penalty shall be an amount equal to the dollar amount of paid sick leave unlawfully withheld multiplied by three, or $250, whichever is greater, not to exceed $5,000. If the violation of this act resulted in additional harm to an employee, such as discharge from employment, or otherwise results in a violation of the rights of the employee, the administrative penalty shall include an additional sum of $500 for each day or portion of a day that the violation occurred or continued, not to exceed $10,000.(4) Comply with any other additional relief that the department deems appropriate.(b) Civil action.--The secretary, the Attorney General or the employee may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction against an employer or other person violating this act and, upon prevailing and except as provided under subsection (c) or (d), shall be entitled to collect legal or equitable relief on behalf of the aggrieved as may be appropriate to remedy the violation, including:(1) Reinstatement of the employee, with or without back pay.20250SB0013PN0846 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Payment of sick leave unlawfully withheld.(3) The payment of an additional sum, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of $5,000, as liquidated damages in the amount of $50 to each employee or person whose rights under this act were violated for each day or portion of a day that the violation occurred or continued. In addition, if the employer has unlawfully withheld paid sick days to an employee, the employer shall pay the dollar amount of paid sick days withheld from the employee multiplied by three or $250, whichever amount is greater.(4) Injunctive relief.(5) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.(c) Limitation on damages.--The secretary, the Attorney General or an employee enforcing this act on behalf of the public as provided for under law shall, upon prevailing, be entitled only to equitable, injunctive or restitutionary relief and reasonable attorney fees and costs.(d) Error.--(1) An employer may not be assessed a penalty or liquidated damages under this section due to an isolated and unintentional payroll error or written notice error that is a clerical or an inadvertent mistake regarding the accrual or available use of paid sick leave.(2) In determining whether to assess a penalty or liquidated damages under this subsection, consideration may be given to whether the employer, prior to an alleged violation, has adopted and is in compliance with a set of policies, procedures and practices that fully comply with this act.(e) Interest.--In an administrative or civil action brought 20250SB0013PN0846 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this section, the secretary or a court shall award interest on each amount due and unpaid calculated in accordance with law.(f) Penalties cumulative.--The remedies, penalties and procedures provided under this section shall be cumulative.Section 11. Construction.This act:(1) May not be construed to invalidate an ordinance or other mandate enacted by a municipality prior to the effective date of this section that requires employers within the municipality to provide paid sick leave benefits more generous than those contained under this act.(2) May not be construed to prohibit a municipality from enacting an ordinance or mandate that requires employers within the municipality to provide paid sick leave benefits more generous than those contained under this act.(3) May not be construed to discourage or prohibit an employer from the adoption or retention of a paid sick leave policy more generous than that contained in this act or any ordinance adopted by a municipality under paragraph (1) or (2).(4) May not be construed preempt or otherwise apply to an ordinance or mandate enacted by a municipality affecting vacation or other forms of leave offered by employers within the municipality.(5) May not be construed to mandate a municipality to adopt an ordinance applicable to employers within the municipality relating to compensation, vacation or other forms of leave from employment.(6) May not be construed to limit or affect any Federal, 20250SB0013PN0846 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State or local law guaranteeing privacy of health information or information related to domestic violence or sexual assault, regarding an employee or employee's family member. The information shall be treated as confidential and may not be disclosed to a person except the affected employee or as required by law.(7) May not be construed to relieve or lessen the obligation of an employer to comply with an existing contract, collective bargaining agreement, employment benefit plan or other agreement providing more generous paid sick leave to an employee than that required by this act or an ordinance adopted by a municipality under paragraph (1) or (2).(8) May not be construed to remove the contents of this act from the scope of collective bargaining under the act of June 1, 1937 (P.L.1168, No.294), known as the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act, the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, or the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act.(9) May not be construed to preempt, limit or affect the applicability of any other law, regulation, requirement, policy or standard that provides for greater accrual or use of paid or unpaid sick leave or that extends other protections to an employee.(10) Shall be in addition to and independent of any other right, remedy or procedure available under any other law and may not be construed to diminish, alter or negate any other legal right, remedy or procedure available to an aggrieved person.20250SB0013PN0846 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 12. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0013PN0846 - 12 - 12